Wyoming, session 2025, SF0151.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 39-13-111(d) is amended to read:
39-13-111. Distribution.
(d) Taxes collected pursuant to W.S. 39-13-113 shall
be distributed by the county treasurer on or before the
tenth day of the month following the month of receipt,
except as otherwise provided in this subsection. Taxes
collected following final reconciliation of the taxes under
W.S. 39-13-113(b) shall be distributed by the county
treasurer on or before the tenth day of the month following
the month of collection. The county treasurer shall not
distribute taxes collected under W.S. 39-13-113 to
governmental entities that do not levy or are not
authorized to levy taxes under W.S. 39-13-104(k) for the
applicable tax year, and any taxes collected on behalf of a
governmental entity that are not authorized or imposed
under W.S. 39-13-104(k) shall be held by the county
treasurer pending the final reconciliation of the taxes
under W.S. 39-13-113(b) for distribution in accordance with
this section.
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0151
ENROLLED ACT NO. 29, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
2